Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Applicability

230.360.
Applicability of racing statutes.

The provisions of this chapter are intended to be statewide and exclusive in their effect and no city, county, or other political subdivision of state government shall have the power or authority to make or enforce any local laws, ordinances, or regulations on the subject of horse race meetings.

Any person licensed under KRS

230.300

shall continue to pay, or be responsible for the payment of, all:

State taxes presently imposed by law, including but without limitation, license taxes imposed under KRS

137.170

to

137.190

and

137.990

, the pari-mutuel taxes imposed by KRS

138.510

to

138.550

, and all state ad valorem taxes; and

Local ad valorem taxes and the license taxes when levied as permitted by KRS

68.182

,

91.202

, and

92.282

.

No tax shall be imposed by the state or any subdivision thereof upon, or measured by, that portion of the excise tax imposed upon pari-mutuel betting at running and trotting horse race tracks which is collected and retained by the operators thereof under the provisions of KRS

138.510

to

138.550

, both inclusive.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 16; 1974, ch. 403, § 8; 1986, ch. 296, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 109, § 24, effective March 30, 1992; 2022 ch. 124, § 17, effective July 14, 2022.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Notes, Chernick v. Fasig-Tipton: A Caveat to the Horse Trader, 74 Ky. L.J. 889 (1985-86).